Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 1. Interest Generally
§ 49.
Computation of interest.

When a note, bill, or other similar obligation is payable on demand or at a specified time, with interest annually, the annual interest that remains unpaid shall bear simple interest from the time it becomes due to the time of final settlement; but if in a year, reckoning from the time the annual interest began to accrue, payments are made, the amount of those payments at the end of that year, with interest thereon from the time of payment, shall be applied: first, to liquidate the simple interest accrued from the unpaid annual interest; second, to liquidate the annual interest due; and third, to extinguish the principal.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 377

(Adj. Sess.), eff. March 26, 1968.

§ 50.
Penalties.

When a greater rate of interest than is allowed by law is paid, the person paying it may recover the amount so paid above the legal interest, with interest thereon from the time of payment and all expenses of collection, including reasonable attorney’s fees, in a civil action on this statute.

Except as otherwise expressly authorized by law, a lender shall not knowingly or willfully make any contract, express or implied, that directly or indirectly calls for the payment of any interest or finance charge in excess of the legal rate as set forth in section 41a of this title. The section shall be enforceable only to the extent herein provided and the lender shall have no right to collect any interest or charges whatsoever and shall have a right to collect only one-half of the principal.

Any person, partnership, association, or corporation and the several members, officers, directors, agents, and employees thereof, who knowingly or willfully contracts for or collects any sum in excess of legal interest for the loan, use, or forbearance of money, unless expressly authorized by law to do so, shall, for the first offense, be fined not more than $500.00 or imprisoned for not more than six months, or both. Upon conviction for violating this section in any transaction entered into or consummated after a first conviction hereunder, the offender shall be fined not more than $1,000.00 or imprisoned for not more than one year, or both.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 377

(Adj. Sess.), eff. March 26, 1968; amended

1979, No. 173

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. April 30, 1980.